Illinois, session 104th, HB4380.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act is 5amended by changing Sections 25-5, 25-20, and 25-52 as 6follows: 7    (5 ILCS 430/25-5)8    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-435)9    Sec. 25-5. Legislative Ethics Commission. 10    (a) The Legislative Ethics Commission is created. 11    (b) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall consist of 8 12commissioners appointed 2 each by the President and Minority 13Leader of the Senate and the Speaker and Minority Leader of the 14House of Representatives.15    The terms of the initial commissioners shall commence upon 16qualification. Each appointing authority shall designate one 17appointee who shall serve for a 2-year term running through 18June 30, 2005. Each appointing authority shall designate one 19appointee who shall serve for a 4-year term running through 20June 30, 2007. The initial appointments shall be made within 2160 days after the effective date of this Act.22    After the initial terms, commissioners shall serve for 234-year terms commencing on July 1 of the year of appointment   HB4380- 2 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1and running through June 30 of the fourth following year. 2Commissioners may be reappointed to one or more subsequent 3terms.4    A vacancy shall occur upon a commissioner's death, 5resignation, removal, disqualification, termination of 6legislative service in the house or caucus of the appointing 7authority, or other inability to act. Vacancies occurring 8other than at the end of a term shall be filled by the 9appointing authority only for the balance of the term of the 10commissioner whose office is vacant.11    Terms shall run regardless of whether the position is 12filled. 13    (c) The appointing authorities shall appoint commissioners 14who have experience holding governmental office or employment 15and may appoint commissioners who are members of the General 16Assembly, and each appointing authority shall appoint at least 17one commissioner as well as commissioners from the general 18public. A commissioner who is a member of the General Assembly 19must recuse himself or herself from participating in any 20matter relating to any investigation or proceeding in which he 21or she is the subject or is a complainant. A person is not 22eligible to serve as a commissioner if that person (i) has been 23convicted of a felony or a crime of dishonesty or moral 24turpitude, (ii) is, or was within the preceding 12 months, 25engaged in activities that require registration under the 26Lobbyist Registration Act, (iii) is a relative of the   HB4380- 3 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1appointing authority, (iv) is a State officer or employee 2other than a member of the General Assembly, or (v) is a 3candidate for statewide, federal, or judicial office.4    (c-5) If a commissioner is required to recuse himself or 5herself from participating in a matter as provided in 6subsection (c), the recusal shall create a temporary vacancy 7for the limited purpose of consideration of the matter for 8which the commissioner recused himself or herself, and the 9appointing authority for the recusing commissioner shall make 10a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy for consideration 11of the matter for which the commissioner recused himself or 12herself. 13    (d) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall have 14jurisdiction over current and former members of the General 15Assembly regarding events occurring during a member's term of 16office and current and former State employees regarding events 17occurring during any period of employment where the State 18employee's ultimate jurisdictional authority is (i) a 19legislative leader, (ii) the Senate Operations Commission, or 20(iii) the Joint Committee on Legislative Support Services. The 21Legislative Ethics Commission shall have jurisdiction over 22complainants and respondents in violation of subsection (d) of 23Section 25-90. The jurisdiction of the Commission is limited 24to matters arising under this Act.25    An officer or executive branch State employee serving on a 26legislative branch board or commission remains subject to the   HB4380- 4 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1jurisdiction of the Executive Ethics Commission and is not 2subject to the jurisdiction of the Legislative Ethics 3Commission. 4    (e) The Legislative Ethics Commission must meet, either in 5person or by other technological means, monthly or as often as 6necessary. At the first meeting of the Legislative Ethics 7Commission, the commissioners shall choose from their number a 8chairperson and other officers that they deem appropriate. The 9terms of officers shall be for 2 years commencing July 1 and 10running through June 30 of the second following year. Meetings 11shall be held at the call of the chairperson or any 3 12commissioners. Official action by the Commission shall require 13the affirmative vote of 5 commissioners, and a quorum shall 14consist of 5 commissioners. Commissioners shall receive no 15compensation but may be reimbursed for their reasonable 16expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.17    (f) No commissioner, other than a commissioner who is a 18member of the General Assembly, or employee of the Legislative 19Ethics Commission may during his or her term of appointment or 20employment:21        (1) become a candidate for any elective office;22        (2) hold any other elected or appointed public office 23    except for appointments on governmental advisory boards or 24    study commissions or as otherwise expressly authorized by 25    law;26        (3) be actively involved in the affairs of any   HB4380- 5 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1    political party or political organization; or2        (4) advocate for the appointment of another person to 3    an appointed or elected office or position or actively 4    participate in any campaign for any elective office.5    (f-5) No commissioner who is a member of the General 6Assembly may be a candidate for statewide, federal, or 7judicial office. If a commissioner who is a member of the 8General Assembly files petitions to be a candidate for a 9statewide, federal, or judicial office, he or she shall be 10deemed to have resigned from his or her position as a 11commissioner on the date his or her name is certified for the 12ballot by the State Board of Elections or local election 13authority and his or her position as a commissioner shall be 14deemed vacant. Such person may not be reappointed to the 15Commission during any time he or she is a candidate for 16statewide, federal, or judicial office. 17    (g) An appointing authority may remove a commissioner only 18for cause. 19    (h) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall appoint an 20Executive Director subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 214 legislative leaders. The compensation of the Executive 22Director shall be as determined by the Commission. The 23Executive Director of the Legislative Ethics Commission may 24employ, subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 4 25legislative leaders, and determine the compensation of staff, 26as appropriations permit.  HB4380- 6 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1    (i) In consultation with the Legislative Inspector 2General, the Legislative Ethics Commission may develop 3comprehensive training for members and employees under its 4jurisdiction that includes, but is not limited to, sexual 5harassment, employment discrimination, and workplace civility. 6The training may be recommended to the ultimate jurisdictional 7authorities and may be approved by the Commission to satisfy 8the sexual harassment training required under Section 5-10.5 9or be provided in addition to the annual sexual harassment 10training required under Section 5-10.5. The Commission may 11seek input from governmental agencies or private entities for 12guidance in developing such training. 13(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-221, eff. 8-9-19; 14101-617, eff. 12-20-19; 102-664, eff. 1-1-22.) 15    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-435)16    Sec. 25-5. Legislative Ethics Commission. 17    (a) The Legislative Ethics Commission is created. 18    (b) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall consist of 8 19commissioners appointed 2 each by the President and Minority 20Leader of the Senate and the Speaker and Minority Leader of the 21House of Representatives.22    The terms of the initial commissioners shall commence upon 23qualification. Each appointing authority shall designate one 24appointee who shall serve for a 2-year term running through 25June 30, 2005. Each appointing authority shall designate one   HB4380- 7 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1appointee who shall serve for a 4-year term running through 2June 30, 2007. The initial appointments shall be made within 360 days after the effective date of this Act.4    After the initial terms, commissioners shall serve for 54-year terms commencing on July 1 of the year of appointment 6and running through June 30 of the fourth following year. 7Commissioners may be reappointed to one or more subsequent 8terms.9    A vacancy shall occur upon a commissioner's death, 10resignation, removal, disqualification, termination of 11legislative service in the house or caucus of the appointing 12authority, or other inability to act. Vacancies occurring 13other than at the end of a term shall be filled by the 14appointing authority only for the balance of the term of the 15commissioner whose office is vacant.16    Terms shall run regardless of whether the position is 17filled. 18    (c) The appointing authorities shall appoint commissioners 19who have experience holding governmental office or employment 20and may appoint commissioners who are members of the General 21Assembly, and each appointing authority shall appoint at least 22one commissioner as well as commissioners from the general 23public. A commissioner who is a member of the General Assembly 24must recuse himself or herself from participating in any 25matter relating to any investigation or proceeding in which he 26or she is the subject or is a complainant. A person is not   HB4380- 8 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1eligible to serve as a commissioner if that person (i) has been 2convicted of a felony or a crime of dishonesty or moral 3turpitude, (ii) is, or was within the preceding 12 months, 4engaged in activities that require registration under the 5Lobbyist Registration Act, (iii) is a relative of the 6appointing authority, (iv) is a State officer or employee 7other than a member of the General Assembly, or (v) is a 8candidate for statewide, federal, or judicial office.9    (c-5) If a commissioner is required to recuse himself or 10herself from participating in a matter as provided in 11subsection (c), the recusal shall create a temporary vacancy 12for the limited purpose of consideration of the matter for 13which the commissioner recused himself or herself, and the 14appointing authority for the recusing commissioner shall make 15a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy for consideration 16of the matter for which the commissioner recused himself or 17herself. 18    (d) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall have 19jurisdiction over current and former members of the General 20Assembly regarding events occurring during a member's term of 21office and current and former State employees regarding events 22occurring during any period of employment where the State 23employee's ultimate jurisdictional authority is (i) a 24legislative leader or (ii) the Joint Committee on Legislative 25Support Services. The Legislative Ethics Commission shall have 26jurisdiction over complainants and respondents in violation of   HB4380- 9 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1subsection (d) of Section 25-90. The jurisdiction of the 2Commission is limited to matters arising under this Act.3    An officer or executive branch State employee serving on a 4legislative branch board or commission remains subject to the 5jurisdiction of the Executive Ethics Commission and is not 6subject to the jurisdiction of the Legislative Ethics 7Commission. 8    (e) The Legislative Ethics Commission must meet, either in 9person or by other technological means, monthly or as often as 10necessary. At the first meeting of the Legislative Ethics 11Commission, the commissioners shall choose from their number a 12chairperson and other officers that they deem appropriate. The 13terms of officers shall be for 2 years commencing July 1 and 14running through June 30 of the second following year. Meetings 15shall be held at the call of the chairperson or any 3 16commissioners. Official action by the Commission shall require 17the affirmative vote of 5 commissioners, and a quorum shall 18consist of 5 commissioners. Commissioners shall receive no 19compensation but may be reimbursed for their reasonable 20expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.21    (f) No commissioner, other than a commissioner who is a 22member of the General Assembly, or employee of the Legislative 23Ethics Commission may during his or her term of appointment or 24employment:25        (1) become a candidate for any elective office;26        (2) hold any other elected or appointed public office   HB4380- 10 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1    except for appointments on governmental advisory boards or 2    study commissions or as otherwise expressly authorized by 3    law;4        (3) be actively involved in the affairs of any 5    political party or political organization; or6        (4) advocate for the appointment of another person to 7    an appointed or elected office or position or actively 8    participate in any campaign for any elective office.9    (f-5) No commissioner who is a member of the General 10Assembly may be a candidate for statewide, federal, or 11judicial office. If a commissioner who is a member of the 12General Assembly files petitions to be a candidate for a 13statewide, federal, or judicial office, he or she shall be 14deemed to have resigned from his or her position as a 15commissioner on the date his or her name is certified for the 16ballot by the State Board of Elections or local election 17authority and his or her position as a commissioner shall be 18deemed vacant. Such person may not be reappointed to the 19Commission during any time he or she is a candidate for 20statewide, federal, or judicial office. 21    (g) An appointing authority may remove a commissioner only 22for cause. 23    (h) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall appoint an 24Executive Director subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 254 legislative leaders. The compensation of the Executive 26Director shall be as determined by the Commission. The   HB4380- 11 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1Executive Director of the Legislative Ethics Commission may 2employ, subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 4 3legislative leaders, and determine the compensation of staff, 4as appropriations permit.5    (i) In consultation with the Legislative Inspector 6General, the Legislative Ethics Commission may develop 7comprehensive training for members and employees under its 8jurisdiction that includes, but is not limited to, sexual 9harassment, employment discrimination, and workplace civility. 10The training may be recommended to the ultimate jurisdictional 11authorities and may be approved by the Commission to satisfy 12the sexual harassment training required under Section 5-10.5 13or be provided in addition to the annual sexual harassment 14training required under Section 5-10.5. The Commission may 15seek input from governmental agencies or private entities for 16guidance in developing such training. 17(Source: P.A. 104-435, eff. 7-1-26.) 18    (5 ILCS 430/25-20)19    Sec. 25-20. Duties of the Legislative Inspector General. 20In addition to duties otherwise assigned by law, the 21Legislative Inspector General shall have the following duties:22        (1) To receive and investigate, without advance 23    approval of the Legislative Ethics Commission, allegations 24    of violations of this Act and other wrongful acts within 25    his or her jurisdiction based on a complaint. Except as   HB4380- 12 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1    otherwise provided in paragraph (1.5), an investigation 2    may not be initiated more than one year after the alleged 3    wrongful act or the most recent act of a series of alleged 4    wrongful acts based on the same wrongful conduct except if 5    there is reasonable cause to believe that fraudulent 6    concealment has occurred. To constitute fraudulent 7    concealment sufficient to toll this limitations period, 8    there must be an affirmative act or representation 9    calculated to prevent discovery of the fact that a 10    violation or other wrongful act has occurred. The 11    Legislative Inspector General shall have the discretion to 12    determine the appropriate means of investigation as 13    permitted by law.14        (1.5) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 15    contrary, the Legislative Inspector General, whether 16    appointed by the Legislative Ethics Commission or the 17    General Assembly, may initiate an investigation based on 18    information provided to the Office of the Legislative 19    Inspector General or the Legislative Ethics Commission 20    during the period from December 1, 2014 through November 21    3, 2017. Any investigation initiated under this paragraph 22    (1.5) must be initiated within one year after the 23    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 24    Assembly. 25        Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 26    the Legislative Inspector General, through the Attorney   HB4380- 13 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1    General, shall have the authority to file a complaint 2    related to any founded violations that occurred during the 3    period December 1, 2014 through November 3, 2017 to the 4    Legislative Ethics Commission, and the Commission shall 5    have jurisdiction to conduct administrative hearings 6    related to any pleadings filed by the Legislative 7    Inspector General, provided the complaint is filed with 8    the Commission no later than 6 months after the summary 9    report is provided to the Attorney General in accordance 10    with subsection (c) of Section 25-50. 11        (2) To request information relating to an 12    investigation from any person when the Legislative 13    Inspector General deems that information necessary in 14    conducting an investigation.15        (3) To issue subpoenas, with the advance approval of 16    the Commission, to compel the attendance of witnesses for 17    the purposes of testimony and production of documents and 18    other items for inspection and copying, and to make 19    service of those subpoenas and subpoenas issued under item 20    (7) of Section 25-15.21        (4) To submit reports as required by this Act.22        (5) To file pleadings in the name of the Legislative 23    Inspector General with the Legislative Ethics Commission, 24    through the Attorney General, as provided in this Article 25    if the Attorney General finds that reasonable cause exists 26    to believe that a violation has occurred.  HB4380- 14 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1        (6) To assist and coordinate the ethics officers for 2    State agencies under the jurisdiction of the Legislative 3    Inspector General and to work with those ethics officers.4        (7) To participate in or conduct, when appropriate, 5    multi-jurisdictional investigations.6        (8) To request, as the Legislative Inspector General 7    deems appropriate, from ethics officers of State agencies 8    under his or her jurisdiction, reports or information on 9    (i) the content of a State agency's ethics training 10    program and (ii) the percentage of new officers and 11    employees who have completed ethics training.12        (9) To establish a policy that ensures the appropriate 13    handling and correct recording of all investigations of 14    allegations and to ensure that the policy is accessible 15    via the Internet in order that those seeking to report 16    those allegations are familiar with the process and that 17    the subjects of those allegations are treated fairly. 18        (10) To post information to the Legislative Inspector 19    General's website explaining to complainants and subjects 20    of an investigation the legal limitations on the 21    Legislative Inspector General's ability to provide 22    information to them and a general overview of the 23    investigation process.24(Source: P.A. 102-664, eff. 1-1-22.) 25    (5 ILCS 430/25-52)  HB4380- 15 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1    Sec. 25-52. Release of summary reports.2    (a) Within 60 days after the Legislative Ethics 3Commission's receipt of a summary report and response from the 4ultimate jurisdictional authority or agency head regarding a 5potential violation of this Act or potential wrongful acts 6within the jurisdiction of the Legislative Inspector General 7that resulted in a suspension of at least 3 days or termination 8of employment, the Legislative Inspector General Ethics 9Commission shall make available to the public the report and 10response or a redacted version of the report and response. The 11Legislative Inspector General Ethics Commission may make 12available to the public any other summary report and response 13of the ultimate jurisdictional authority or agency head or a 14redacted version of the report and response without prior 15approval from the Legislative Ethics Commission. The 16Legislative Ethics Commission shall adopt no rule requiring 17the Legislative Inspector General to seek the Commission's 18advance approval before publishing summary reports authorized 19under this Article. Any commission rule in existence on, the 20effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly requiring the Legislative Inspector General to seek 22the Commission's advance approval before commencing any 23investigation is void.24    (b) The Legislative Inspector General Ethics Commission 25shall redact information in the summary report that may reveal 26the identity of witnesses, complainants, or informants or if   HB4380- 16 -LRB104 18131 WRO 31570 b1the Legislative Inspector General Commission determines it is 2appropriate to protect the identity of a person before 3publication. The Commission may also redact any information it 4believes should not be made public. Prior to publication, the 5Legislative Inspector General Commission shall permit the 6respondents, Legislative Ethics Commission Inspector General, 7and Attorney General to review documents to be made public and 8offer suggestions for redaction or provide a response that 9shall be made public with the summary report.10    (c) The Legislative Ethics Commission may withhold 11publication of the report or response if the Legislative 12Inspector General or Attorney General certifies that 13publication will interfere with an ongoing investigation.14(Source: P.A. 96-555, eff. 8-18-09.) 15    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 16changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 17that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 18represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 19not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 20made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 21Public Act.